Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection.
Sec. 45.50.536.
Mediation.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

, a civil action under AS

45.50.531

or

45.50.535

may be submitted to mediation under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. The mediation must begin within 30 days after the court’s order for mediation. During mediation, the court may, if it is determined appropriate by the court, enjoin the defendant from engaging in the act or practice that is the subject of the civil action.

History.

(§ 5 ch 96 SLA 1998)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 96, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 enactment of this section “applies only to causes of action that accrue on or after September 10, 1998.”

Sec. 45.50.537.
Attorney fees, costs, and damages.

In an action brought by a private person under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

, a prevailing plaintiff shall be awarded costs as provided by court rule and full reasonable attorney fees at the prevailing reasonable rate.

Unless the action is found to be frivolous, in an action brought by a private person under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

, a prevailing defendant shall be awarded attorney fees and costs as provided by court rule. If the action is found to be frivolous, the attorney fees to be awarded to the defendant shall be full reasonable attorney fees at the prevailing reasonable rate.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, in an action brought by a private person under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

, if the plaintiff is not the prevailing party and if the court finds that the action was brought by the plaintiff to obtain a competitive business advantage, the court shall award a prevailing defendant costs as provided by court rule, full reasonable attorney fees at the prevailing reasonable rate, and any damages suffered by the prevailing defendant as a result of the plaintiff’s allegations.

In an action brought by the attorney general under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

, if the attorney general prevails, the state shall be awarded its actual attorney fees and costs, including costs of investigation, to the extent those fees and costs are reasonable.

In this section, “frivolous” means

not reasonably based on evidence or on existing law or a reasonable extension, modification, or reversal of existing law; or

brought to harass the defendant or to cause unnecessary delay or needless expense.

History.

(§ 5 ch 96 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 169 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e) and relettered in 2004, at which time what was formerly subsection (d) was relettered as (e).

Cross references. —

Under § 3, ch. 169, SLA 2004, the provisions of (d) of this section apply only to causes of action that accrue on or after October 24, 2004.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 169, SLA 2004 provides that the 2004 enactment of subsection (e) (now (d)) has the effect of amending Rules 54(d), 79, and 82, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, by establishing rules for the award of actual attorney fees and costs in certain actions relating to unfair trade practices that are brought under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

, to the extent those fees and costs are reasonable.

Sec. 45.50.541.
Nonnegotiability of consumer paper.

If a contract for sale or lease of consumer goods or services on credit entered into between a retail seller and a retail buyer requires or involves the execution of a promissory note or instrument or other evidence of indebtedness of the buyer, the note, instrument, or evidence of indebtedness shall have printed on its face the words “consumer paper,” and the note, instrument, or evidence of indebtedness with the words “consumer paper” printed on it is not a negotiable instrument, within the meaning of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code).

Notwithstanding the absence of such a notice on a note, instrument, or evidence of indebtedness arising out of a consumer credit sale or consumer lease as described in this section, an assignee of the rights of the seller or lessor is subject to all claims and defenses of the buyer or lessee against the seller or lessor arising out of the sale or lease. An agreement to the contrary has no effect in limiting the rights of a consumer.

The assignee’s liability under this section may not exceed the amount owing to the assignee at the time the claim or defense is asserted against the assignee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 246 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 45.50.542.
Provisions not waivable.

A waiver by a consumer of the provisions of AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

is contrary to public policy and is unenforceable and void.

History.

(§ 7 ch 53 SLA 1974)

Sec. 45.50.545.
Interpretation.

In interpreting AS

45.50.471

due consideration and great weight should be given the interpretations of 15 U.S.C. 45(a)(1) (§ 5(a)(1) of the Federal Trade Commission Act).

History.

(§ 8 ch 53 SLA 1974)

Sec. 45.50.551.
Civil penalties.

A person who violates the terms of an injunction or restraining order issued under AS

45.50.501

shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of not more than $50,000 for each violation. For the purposes of this section, the superior court in a judicial district issuing an injunction retains jurisdiction, and, in these cases, the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition for recovery of the penalties.

In an action brought under AS

45.50.501

, if the court finds that a person is using or has used an act or practice declared unlawful by AS

45.50.471

, the attorney general, upon petition to the court, may recover, on behalf of the state, a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 and not more than $25,000 for each violation.

[Repealed by § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 246 SLA 1970; am § 9 ch 53 SLA 1974; am § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 98 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 98, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendments of (a) and (b) of this section apply “to all penalties assessed on or after October 31, 2006, regardless of when the conduct occurred.”

Sec. 45.50.561.
Definitions; short title.

In AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

“advertising” includes the attempt directly or indirectly by publication, dissemination, solicitation, endorsement, or circulation, display in any manner, including solicitation or dissemination by mail, telephone or door-to-door contacts, or in any other way, to induce directly or indirectly a person to enter or not enter into an obligation or acquire title or interest in any merchandise or to increase the consumption of it or to make a loan;

“cemetery lot” means a lot, plot, space, grave, niche, mausoleum, crypt, vault, or columbarium, used or intended to be used for the interment of human remains;

“chain distributor scheme” means a sales device whereby a person, upon condition that the person make an investment, is granted a license or right to solicit or recruit for profit one or more additional persons who are also granted a license or right upon condition of making an investment and may further perpetuate the chain of persons who are granted a license or right upon the condition of investment; a limitation as to the number of persons who may participate, or the presence of additional conditions affecting eligibility for the license or right to solicit or recruit or the receipt of profit from these does not change the identity of the scheme as a chain distributor scheme; as used in this paragraph, “investment” means acquisition, for a consideration other than personal services, of tangible or intangible property, and includes franchises, business opportunities, and services; “investment” does not include sales demonstration equipment and materials furnished at cost for use in making sales and not for resale;

“consumer” means a person who seeks or acquires goods or services by lease or purchase;

“dealing in hearing aids” has the meaning given in AS

08.55.200

;

“documentary material” means the original or a copy of a book, record, report, memorandum, paper, communication, tabulation, map, chart, photograph, mechanical transcription, or other tangible document or recording, wherever situate;

“examination” of documentary material includes the inspection, study, or copying of the material, and the taking of testimony under oath or acknowledgment in respect of documentary material or copy of it;

“fresh” means a condition of food that has never been frozen;

“goods or services” includes goods or services provided in connection with a consumer credit transaction or with a transaction involving an indebtedness secured by the borrower’s residence;

“hearing aid” has the meaning given in AS

08.55.200

;

“knowingly” means actual awareness of the falsity or deception, but actual awareness may be inferred where objective manifestations indicate that a person acted with actual awareness;

“seconds” means manufactured items having flaws or consisting of a standard quantity or quality less than the manufacturer’s quality standard.

AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

may be cited as the Alaska Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 246 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 53 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 138 SLA 1974; am § 13 ch 107 SLA 1984; am § 13 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 66 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 9 ch 55 SLA 2004; am § 40 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1984, 1986, and 2004 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Administrative Code. —

For retail advertising, see 9 AAC 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (3), deleted “but is not limited to” following “tangible or intangible property, and includes”.